Illinois, session 104th, SB2734.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 1986 is 5amended by changing Section 304 as follows: 6    (750 ILCS 60/304)  (from Ch. 40, par. 2313-4)7    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 104-290)8    Sec. 304. Assistance by law enforcement officers. 9    (a) Whenever a law enforcement officer has reason to 10believe that a person has been abused, neglected, or exploited 11by a family or household member, the officer shall immediately 12use all reasonable means to prevent further abuse, neglect, or 13exploitation, including:14        (1) Arresting the abusing, neglecting and exploiting 15    party, where appropriate;16        (2) If there is probable cause to believe that 17    particular weapons were used to commit the incident of 18    abuse, subject to constitutional limitations, seizing and 19    taking inventory of the weapons;20        (3) Accompanying the victim of abuse, neglect, or 21    exploitation to his or her place of residence for a 22    reasonable period of time to remove necessary personal 23    belongings and possessions;  SB2734- 2 -LRB104 16021 JRC 29279 b1        (4) Offering the victim of abuse, neglect, or 2    exploitation immediate and adequate information (written 3    in a language appropriate for the victim or in Braille or 4    communicated in appropriate sign language), which shall 5    include a summary of the procedures and relief available 6    to victims of abuse under subsection (c) of Section 217 7    and the officer's name and badge number;8        (5) Providing the victim with one referral to an 9    accessible service agency;10        (6) Advising the victim of abuse about seeking medical 11    attention and preserving evidence (specifically including 12    photographs of injury or damage and damaged clothing or 13    other property); and14        (7) Providing or arranging accessible transportation 15    for the victim of abuse (and, at the victim's request, any 16    minors or dependents in the victim's care) to a medical 17    facility for treatment of injuries or to a nearby place of 18    shelter or safety; or, after the close of court business 19    hours, providing or arranging for transportation for the 20    victim (and, at the victim's request, any minors or 21    dependents in the victim's care) to the nearest available 22    circuit judge or associate judge so the victim may file a 23    petition for an emergency order of protection under 24    subsection (c) of Section 217. When a victim of abuse 25    chooses to leave the scene of the offense, it shall be 26    presumed that it is in the best interests of any minors or   SB2734- 3 -LRB104 16021 JRC 29279 b1    dependents in the victim's care to remain with the victim 2    or a person designated by the victim, rather than to 3    remain with the abusing party.4    (b) Whenever a law enforcement officer does not exercise 5arrest powers or otherwise initiate criminal proceedings, the 6officer shall:7        (1) Make a police report of the investigation of any 8    bona fide allegation of an incident of abuse, neglect, or 9    exploitation and the disposition of the investigation, in 10    accordance with subsection (a) of Section 303;11        (2) Inform the victim of abuse neglect, or 12    exploitation of the victim's right to request that a 13    criminal proceeding be initiated where appropriate, 14    including specific times and places for meeting with the 15    State's Attorney's office, a warrant officer, or other 16    official in accordance with local procedure; and17        (3) Advise the victim of the importance of seeking 18    medical attention and preserving evidence (specifically 19    including photographs of injury or damage and damaged 20    clothing or other property).21    (c) Except as provided by Section 24-6 of the Criminal 22Code of 2012 or under a court order, any weapon seized under 23subsection (a)(2) shall be returned forthwith to the person 24from whom it was seized when it is no longer needed for 25evidentiary purposes.26(Source: P.A. 97-1150, eff. 1-25-13.)   SB2734- 4 -LRB104 16021 JRC 29279 b1    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-290)2    Sec. 304. Assistance by law enforcement officers. 3    (a) Whenever a law enforcement officer has reason to 4believe that a person has been abused, neglected, or exploited 5by a family or household member, the officer shall immediately 6use all reasonable means to prevent further abuse, neglect, or 7exploitation, including:8        (1) Arresting the abusing, neglecting, and exploiting 9    party, if appropriate. However, if the alleged offender is 10    a juvenile, then the officer, based on the totality of the 11    circumstances and using the Adolescent Domestic Battery 12    Typology Tool, may choose not to arrest the juvenile and 13    instead may divert the juvenile or may assist the juvenile 14    and the juvenile's family in finding alternative 15    placement. In any situation in which law enforcement does 16    not make an arrest under this Act, the officer shall 17    forward the report of the incident to the State's 18    Attorney's office for review;19        (2) If there is probable cause to believe that 20    particular weapons were used to commit the incident of 21    abuse, subject to constitutional limitations, seizing and 22    taking inventory of the weapons;23        (3) Accompanying the victim of abuse, neglect, or 24    exploitation to his or her place of residence for a 25    reasonable period of time to remove necessary personal   SB2734- 5 -LRB104 16021 JRC 29279 b1    belongings and possessions;2        (3.5) complete the intimate partner violence risk and 3    lethality assessment instrument; 4        (4) Offering the victim of abuse, neglect, or 5    exploitation immediate and adequate information (written 6    in a language appropriate for the victim or in Braille or 7    communicated in appropriate sign language), which shall 8    include a summary of the procedures and relief available 9    to victims of abuse under subsection (c) of Section 217 10    and the officer's name and badge number;11        (5) Providing the victim with one referral to an 12    accessible service agency;13        (6) Advising the victim of abuse about seeking medical 14    attention and preserving evidence (specifically including 15    photographs of injury or damage and damaged clothing or 16    other property); and17        (7) Providing or arranging accessible transportation 18    for the victim of abuse (and, at the victim's request, any 19    minors or dependents in the victim's care) to a medical 20    facility for treatment of injuries or to a nearby place of 21    shelter or safety; or, after the close of court business 22    hours, providing or arranging for transportation for the 23    victim (and, at the victim's request, any minors or 24    dependents in the victim's care) to the nearest available 25    circuit judge or associate judge so the victim may file a 26    petition for an emergency order of protection under   SB2734- 6 -LRB104 16021 JRC 29279 b1    subsection (c) of Section 217. When a victim of abuse 2    chooses to leave the scene of the offense, it shall be 3    presumed that it is in the best interests of any minors or 4    dependents in the victim's care to remain with the victim 5    or a person designated by the victim, rather than to 6    remain with the abusing party.7    (b) Whenever a law enforcement officer does not exercise 8arrest powers or otherwise initiate criminal proceedings, the 9officer shall:10        (1) Make a police report of the investigation of any 11    bona fide allegation of an incident of abuse, neglect, or 12    exploitation and the disposition of the investigation, in 13    accordance with subsection (a) of Section 303;14        (2) Inform the victim of abuse neglect, or 15    exploitation of the victim's right to request that a 16    criminal proceeding be initiated where appropriate, 17    including specific times and places for meeting with the 18    State's Attorney's office, a warrant officer, or other 19    official in accordance with local procedure; and20        (3) Advise the victim of the importance of seeking 21    medical attention and preserving evidence (specifically 22    including photographs of injury or damage and damaged 23    clothing or other property).24    (c) Except as provided by Section 24-6 of the Criminal 25Code of 2012 or under a court order, any weapon seized under 26subsection (a)(2) shall be returned forthwith to the person   SB2734- 7 -LRB104 16021 JRC 29279 b1from whom it was seized when it is no longer needed for 2evidentiary purposes.3(Source: P.A. 104-290, eff. 11-13-25.) 4    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 5changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 6that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 7represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 8not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 9made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 10Public Act.